dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.aff
FLAG long
SFX xS èser saró èser	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró
SFX xS èser saró èser	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró
SFX xS èser saró èser	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró
SFX xS èser saró/I5 èser	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró
SFX xS èser sean/P0P1 èser	vt:imperative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo, pavan
SFX xS èser seam/P0P1 èser	vt:imperative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo, pavan
SFX xS èser semo/P0P1 èser	vt:imperative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xS èser semo-ƚo/P2 èser	vt:imperative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xS èser simo/P0P1 èser	vt:imperative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xS èser simo-ƚo/P2 èser	vt:imperative+present is:first is:plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xS èser son/P0P1P2 èser	vt:imperative+present is:first is:plural	# T12 + ón
SFX xS èser sen/P0P1P2 èser	vt:imperative+present is:first is:plural	# T12 + én
SFX xS èser sí èser	vt:imperative+present is:second cl:pronomenal+accusative	# T9
SFX xS èser sé èser	vt:imperative+present is:second cl:pronomenal+accusative	# T9
SFX xS èser sé èser	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T5 = T12 + ((i)è|é)
SFX xS èser sí èser	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T5
SFX xS èser sè èser	vt:imperative+present is:second is:plural	# T12 + ((i)è|é), ŧenedexe
SFX xS èser ser/P0P1 èser	vt:infinitive+simple is:apheresis	# T1 + r(e)
SFX xS èser stasto/M2F0F3 èser	vt:participle+passive+weak	# T7 + st[oiae], metaplaxmo
SFX xS èser sendo/P0P1 èser	vt:gerund+simple	# T7 + n[dt]o
SFX xS èser sendo-ƚo/P2 èser	vt:gerund+simple cl:pronomenal+accusative	# T7 + n[dt]o
SFX xS èser sento/P0P1 èser	vt:gerund+simple	# T7 + n[dt]o, pavan
SFX xS èser sento-ƚo/P2 èser	vt:gerund+simple cl:pronomenal+accusative	# T7 + n[dt]o, pavan
SFX xS èser sèndo/P0P1 èser	vt:gerund+simple	# T7 + n[dt]o, veronexe
SFX xS èser sèndo-ƚo/P2 èser	vt:gerund+simple cl:pronomenal+accusative	# T7 + n[dt]o, veronexe
SFX xS èser siando/P0P1A0 èser	vt:gerund+simple	# T7 + n[dt]o, metaplaxmo
SFX xS èser siando-ƚo/P2 èser	vt:gerund+simple cl:pronomenal+accusative	# T7 + n[dt]o, metaplaxmo
SFX xS èser sipiando/P0P1A0 èser	vt:gerund+simple	# T7 + n[dt]o, metaplaxmo, pavan
SFX xS èser sipiando-ƚo/P2 èser	vt:gerund+simple cl:pronomenal+accusative	# T7 + n[dt]o, metaplaxmo, pavan
SFX xS èser seando/P0P1A0 èser	vt:gerund+simple	# T7 + n[dt]o, paduan, metaplaxmo
SFX xS èser seando-ƚo/P2 èser	vt:gerund+simple cl:pronomenal+accusative	# T7 + n[dt]o, paduan, metaplaxmo
SFX xS èser sianto/P0P1 èser	vt:gerund+simple	# T7 + n[dt]o, pavan, metaplaxmo
SFX xS èser sianto-ƚo/P2 èser	vt:gerund+simple cl:pronomenal+accusative	# T7 + n[dt]o, pavan, metaplaxmo
